Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 8

Metropolitan Government—Housing Trust Fund

7-8-101. Authorized.

Any county having a metropolitan form of government may establish a housing trust fund for the purposes set out in this chapter, to be administered by the housing development agency of such county (herein referred to as “agency”) in accordance with this chapter. The cost of administering this fund shall be borne by the agency out of its administrative budget.

The funds provided for by this chapter shall be used to provide low income persons with safe and affordable housing. Funds shall be loaned, or grants made available, from the housing trust fund for programs to include, but not be limited to, the following: bi-weekly mortgages; rehabilitation loans for substantial rehabilitation of existing residential real property; weatherization for existing single family residences, which shall be mandatory after the qualified individual has received assistance three (3) times from a low income energy program in the county; land acquisition in redevelopment areas; interest buy-down to enable a qualified individual to purchase a residence; and homeless shelters.

Acts 1987, ch. 411, § 1.

7-8-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Housing trust fund” means appropriations, reserves or dedications of any funds by the county;

“Low income persons” means qualified persons or families who lack the amount of income that is necessary, as determined by the agency, to enable them, without low interest financial assistance, to live in decent, safe and affordable dwellings without overcrowding; and

“Substantial rehabilitation” means improvements made to residential real property that exceed thirty-five percent (35%) of the proposed market value of the structure after rehabilitation.

Acts 1987, ch. 411, § 2.

7-8-103. Disposition of funds.

Any loans or grants to applicants by the county, including interest earned on investment of repayments of the loans, shall be used to benefit low income individuals or families residing within the county. All funds received for the purposes provided for in this chapter and all such interest repayments shall be added to the housing trust fund and deposited in an accredited financial institution located within the county to be designated by the county. The funds shall be deposited in a separate account earmarked to be used solely for programs established through and included in the housing trust fund pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1987, ch. 411, § 3.

7-8-104. Design of program — Rules and regulations.

The agency shall design and tailor the program according to its needs and requirements and shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations to implement the effect and intent of this chapter.

Acts 1987, ch. 411, § 4.

7-8-105. Escrow account — Loan fund endowment — Contributions.

Any county having a metropolitan form of government may create a special escrow account earmarked for the sole purpose of generating revenue to provide low income persons, as defined in § 7-8-102, with safe and affordable housing.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the escrow account shall consist of amounts deposited voluntarily, including, but not limited to, funds that are held in escrow and represent earnest money in real estate transactions, mortgage reserve account deposits, and tenant security deposits.

Any such county may establish a loan fund endowment in connection with the housing trust fund program, and may charge up to five dollars ($5.00) per month for the term of the loan as a participation fee in lieu of interest on loans made to qualified individuals. All proceeds from a loan fund endowment shall be used to support the housing trust fund and may be used as required under this chapter.

The county may make “in-kind” contributions. Such in-kind contributions may include, but not be limited to, land, personnel costs, program support costs, such as accounting, audit, purchasing services, and other costs as established by a cost allocation plan that directly supports program operations.

Acts 1987, ch. 411, § 5.

7-8-106. Use of homebuyers' revolving loan fund pool funds.

The county may utilize any funds authorized by title 13, chapter 23, part 3, as provided by §13-23-303(b) for any and all authorized purposes in the housing trust fund.

Acts 1987, ch. 411, § 6.

Chapters 9-20

[Reserved]